pt-BR: Material da cabeça do taco: Alumínio; Aço carbono; Aço forjado; Aço inoxidável; Titânio; Zinco; Outros
ru: Материал головки клюшки: Алюминий; Углеродистая сталь; Кованая сталь; Нержавеющая сталь; Титан; Цинк; Другое
pl: Materiał główki kija golfowego: Aluminium; Stal węglowa; Kuta stal; Stal nierdzewna; Tytan; Cynk; Inny
sk-SK: Materiál hlavy pálky: Hliník; Uhlíková oceľ; Kovaná oceľ; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Titán; Zinok; Iné
es: Material de la cabeza del palo de golf: Aluminio; Acero al carbono; Acero forjado; Acero inoxidable; Titanio; Zinc; Otro
pt-PT: Material da cabeça do taco: Alumínio; Aço carbono; Aço forjado; Aço inoxidável; Titânio; Zinco; Outro
ja: クラブヘッドの素材: アルミニウム; 炭素鋼; 鍛造鋼; ステンレススチール; チタン; 亜鉛; その他
zh-TW: 桿頭材質: 鋁; 碳鋼; 鍛造鋼; 不鏽鋼; 鈦金屬; 鋅; 其他
fi: Mailan pään materiaali: Alumiini; Hiiliteräs; Taottu teräs; Ruostumaton teräs; Titaani; Sinkki; Muu
ko: 클럽 헤드 재질: 알루미늄; 탄소강; 단조강; 스테인리스 스틸; 티타늄; 아연; 기타
th: วัสดุหัวไม้กอล์ฟ: อะลูมิเนียม; เหล็กคาร์บอน; เหล็กฟอร์จ; สเตนเลสสตีล; ไทเทเนียม; สังกะสี; อื่นๆ
sv: Klubbhuvudets material: Aluminium; Kolstål; Smitt stål; Rostfritt stål; Titan; Zink; Övrigt
sl-SI: Material glave palice: Aluminij; Ogljikovo jeklo; Kovano jeklo; Nerjavno jeklo; Titan; Cink; Drugo
it: Materiale per la testa della mazza: Alluminio; Acciaio al carbonio; Acciaio forgiato; Acciaio inossidabile; Titanio; Zinco; Altro
tr: Sopa başlığı malzemesi: Alüminyum; Karbon çelik; Dövme çelik; Paslanmaz çelik; Titanyum; Çinko; Diğer
lt-LT: Lazdos galvutės medžiaga: Aliuminis; Anglinis plienas; Kaltinis plienas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Titanas; Cinkas; Kita
bg-BG: Материал на главата на стика: Алуминий; Въглеродна стомана; Кована стомана; Неръждаема стомана; Титан; Цинк; Други
nl: materiaal voor de clubkopClubhoofd materiaal: Aluminium; Koolstofstaal; Gesmeed staal; Roestvrij staal; Titanium; Zink; Overig
en: Club head material: Aluminum; Carbon steel; Forged steel; Stainless steel; Titanium; Zinc; Other
hu: Ütőfej anyaga: Alumínium; Szénacél; Kovácsolt acél; Rozsdamentes acél; Titán; Cink; Egyéb
hr-HR: Materijal glave palice: Aluminij; Ugljični čelik; Kovani čelik; Nehrđajući čelik; Titanij; Cink; Ostalo
da: Køllehovedmateriale: Aluminium; Kulstofstål; Smedet stål; Rustfrit stål; Titanium; Zink; Andet
de: Material des Schlägerkopfs: Aluminium; Kohlenstoffstahl; Geschmiedeter Stahl; Edelstahl; Titan; Zink; Andere
ro-RO: Materialul capului de crosă: Aluminiu; Oțel carbon; Oțel forjat; Oțel inoxidabil; Titan; Zinc; Altele
nb: Materiale for køllehodet: Aluminium; Karbonstål; Smidd stål; Rustfritt stål; Titan; Sink; Annet
el: Υλικό κεφαλής μπαστούνιου: Αλουμίνιο; Ανθρακούχος χάλυβας; Σφυρήλατος χάλυβας; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Τιτάνιο; Ψευδάργυρος; Άλλο
cs: Materiál hlavy golfové hole: Hliník; Uhlíková ocel; Kovaná ocel; Nerezová ocel; Titan; Zinek; Jiný
vi: Vật liệu đầu gậy: Nhôm; Thép carbon; Thép rèn; Thép không gỉ; Titanium; Kẽm; Khác
fr: Matériau de la tête de club: Aluminium; Acier au carbone; Acier forgé; Acier inoxydable; Titane; Zinc; Autre
zh-CN: 球杆头材质: 铝; 碳钢; 锻钢; 不锈钢; 钛; 锌; 其他